Illinois, session 104th, SB273.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 1-6, 12-3.05, 16-1, and 17-56 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/1-6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1-6)7    Sec. 1-6. Place of trial. 8    (a) Generally.9    Criminal actions shall be tried in the county where the 10offense was committed, except as otherwise provided by law. 11The State is not required to prove during trial that the 12alleged offense occurred in any particular county in this 13State. When a defendant contests the place of trial under this 14Section, all proceedings regarding this issue shall be 15conducted under Section 114-1 of the Code of Criminal 16Procedure of 1963. All objections of improper place of trial 17are waived by a defendant unless made before trial.18    (b) Assailant and Victim in Different Counties.19    If a person committing an offense upon the person of 20another is located in one county and his victim is located in 21another county at the time of the commission of the offense, 22trial may be had in either of said counties.23    (c) Death and Cause of Death in Different Places or   SB0273- 2 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1Undetermined.2    If cause of death is inflicted in one county and death 3ensues in another county, the offender may be tried in either 4county. If neither the county in which the cause of death was 5inflicted nor the county in which death ensued are known 6before trial, the offender may be tried in the county where the 7body was found.8    (d) Offense Commenced Outside the State.9    If the commission of an offense commenced outside the 10State is consummated within this State, the offender shall be 11tried in the county where the offense is consummated.12    (e) Offenses Committed in Bordering Navigable Waters.13    If an offense is committed on any of the navigable waters 14bordering on this State, the offender may be tried in any 15county adjacent to such navigable water.16    (f) Offenses Committed while in Transit.17    If an offense is committed upon any railroad car, vehicle, 18watercraft or aircraft passing within this State, and it 19cannot readily be determined in which county the offense was 20committed, the offender may be tried in any county through 21which such railroad car, vehicle, watercraft or aircraft has 22passed.23    (g) Theft.24    A person who commits theft of property may be tried in any 25county in which he exerted control over such property.26    (h) Bigamy.  SB0273- 3 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    A person who commits the offense of bigamy may be tried in 2any county where the bigamous marriage or bigamous 3cohabitation has occurred.4    (i) Kidnaping.5    A person who commits the offense of kidnaping may be tried 6in any county in which his victim has traveled or has been 7confined during the course of the offense.8    (j) Pandering.9    A person who commits the offense of pandering as set forth 10in subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) of Section 11-14.3 may 11be tried in any county in which the prostitution was practiced 12or in any county in which any act in furtherance of the offense 13shall have been committed.14    (k) Treason.15    A person who commits the offense of treason may be tried in 16any county.17    (l) Criminal Defamation.18    If criminal defamation is spoken, printed or written in 19one county and is received or circulated in another or other 20counties, the offender shall be tried in the county where the 21defamation is spoken, printed or written. If the defamation is 22spoken, printed or written outside this state, or the offender 23resides outside this state, the offender may be tried in any 24county in this state in which the defamation was circulated or 25received.26    (m) Inchoate Offenses.  SB0273- 4 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    A person who commits an inchoate offense may be tried in 2any county in which any act which is an element of the offense, 3including the agreement in conspiracy, is committed.4    (n) Accountability for Conduct of Another.5    Where a person in one county solicits, aids, abets, 6agrees, or attempts to aid another in the planning or 7commission of an offense in another county, he may be tried for 8the offense in either county.9    (o) Child Abduction.10    A person who commits the offense of child abduction may be 11tried in any county in which his victim has traveled, been 12detained, concealed or removed to during the course of the 13offense. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless for good cause 14shown, the preferred place of trial shall be the county of the 15residence of the lawful custodian.16    (p) A person who commits the offense of narcotics 17racketeering may be tried in any county where cannabis or a 18controlled substance which is the basis for the charge of 19narcotics racketeering was used; acquired; transferred or 20distributed to, from or through; or any county where any act 21was performed to further the use; acquisition, transfer or 22distribution of said cannabis or controlled substance; any 23money, property, property interest, or any other asset 24generated by narcotics activities was acquired, used, sold, 25transferred or distributed to, from or through; or, any 26enterprise interest obtained as a result of narcotics   SB0273- 5 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1racketeering was acquired, used, transferred or distributed 2to, from or through, or where any activity was conducted by the 3enterprise or any conduct to further the interests of such an 4enterprise.5    (q) A person who commits the offense of money laundering 6may be tried in any county where any part of a financial 7transaction in criminally derived property took place or in 8any county where any money or monetary instrument which is the 9basis for the offense was acquired, used, sold, transferred or 10distributed to, from or through.11    (r) A person who commits the offense of cannabis 12trafficking or controlled substance trafficking may be tried 13in any county.14    (s) A person who commits the offense of online sale of 15stolen property, online theft by deception, or electronic 16fencing may be tried in any county where any one or more 17elements of the offense took place, regardless of whether the 18element of the offense was the result of acts by the accused, 19the victim or by another person, and regardless of whether the 20defendant was ever physically present within the boundaries of 21the county.22    (t) A person who commits the offense of identity theft or 23aggravated identity theft may be tried in any one of the 24following counties in which: (1) the offense occurred; (2) the 25information used to commit the offense was illegally used; or 26(3) the victim resides.  SB0273- 6 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    (u) A person who commits the offense of financial 2exploitation of an elderly person or a person with a 3disability may be tried in any one of the following counties in 4which: (1) any part of the offense occurred; or (2) the victim 5or one of the victims reside; or (3) any part of the assets 6that the person obtained control over are held. 7    If a person is charged with more than one violation of 8identity theft or aggravated identity theft and those 9violations may be tried in more than one county, any of those 10counties is a proper venue for all of the violations. 11(Source: P.A. 101-394, eff. 1-1-20.) 12    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)13    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 14    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 15battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the 16discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 17following:18        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 19    or disfigurement.20        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 21    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 22    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 23    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 24    or a bomb or explosive compound.25        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability   SB0273- 7 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 2    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 3    private security officer, correctional institution 4    employee, or Department of Human Services employee 5    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 6    sexually violent persons:7            (i) performing his or her official duties;8            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 9        official duties; or10            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 11        or her official duties.12        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 13    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 14    older. It is not a defense to this paragraph that the 15    person reasonably believed the individual battered to be 16    less than 60 years of age. 17        (5) Strangles another individual. 18    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 19intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 20age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 21he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 22means:23        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 24    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 25    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 26    disability; or  SB0273- 8 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 2    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 3    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 4    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 5aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 6by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person 7battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 8place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 9domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 10or other building, structure, or place used for religious 11worship.12    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 13aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 14by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 15battered to be any of the following:16        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.17        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 18    disability.19        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 20    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 21    building used for school purposes.22        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 23    fireman, private security officer, correctional 24    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 25    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 26    persons or sexually violent persons:  SB0273- 9 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1            (i) performing his or her official duties;2            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 3        official duties; or4            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 5        or her official duties.6        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency 7    medical services personnel, or utility worker:8            (i) performing his or her official duties;9            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 10        official duties; or11            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 12        or her official duties.13        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 14    unit of local government, or a school district, while 15    performing his or her official duties.16        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 17    duties, or a transit passenger.18        (8) A taxi driver on duty.19        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 20    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 21    Code and the person without legal justification by any 22    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.23        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 24    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 25    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 26    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a   SB0273- 10 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    process server.2        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 3    duties as a nurse. 4        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 5    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions 6    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 7    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 8    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 9    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 10    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 11    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 12    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 13    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 14    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 15aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 16knowingly does any of the following:17        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 18    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 19    to another person.20        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 21    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 22    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 23    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 24    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 25    institution employee, or emergency management worker:26            (i) performing his or her official duties;  SB0273- 11 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 2        official duties; or3            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 4        or her official duties.5        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 6    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 7    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 8    services personnel:9            (i) performing his or her official duties;10            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 11        official duties; or12            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 13        or her official duties.14        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 15    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 16    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 17    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 18    school or in any part of a building used for school 19    purposes.20        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 21    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.22        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 23    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 24    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 25    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 26    private security officer, correctional institution   SB0273- 12 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    employee or emergency management worker:2            (i) performing his or her official duties;3            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 4        official duties; or5            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 6        or her official duties.7        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 8    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 9    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:10            (i) performing his or her official duties;11            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 12        official duties; or13            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 14        or her official duties.15        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 16    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 17    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 18    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 19    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 20    any part of a building used for school purposes. 21    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 22commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 23or she does any of the following:24        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 25    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 26    24.8-0.1 of this Code.  SB0273- 13 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 2    identity.3        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 4    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 5    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 6    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 7    another.8        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 9    the intent to disseminate the recording. 10    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 11aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 12he or she does any of the following:13        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 14    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 15    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 16    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 17    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 18    substance.19        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 20    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 21    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 22    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 23    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 24    person any food containing any substance or object 25    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.26        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a   SB0273- 14 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 2    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 3    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 4    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 5    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 6    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 7    of Human Services.8    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 9battery is a Class 3 felony.10    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 11(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 13(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.14    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 15Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 16involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 17(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 18of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 19physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 20the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 21    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 22Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 23permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 24be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 25religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 26building, structure, or place used for religious worship.   SB0273- 15 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 2felony if:3        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 4    instrument while committing the offense;5        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 6    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 7    committing the offense; or8        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 9    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 10    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 11    state. 12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 13Class X felony.14    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 15Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 16of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 17years.18    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 19Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 20of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 21years.22    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 23(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 24be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 25and a maximum of 60 years.26    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6),   SB0273- 16 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 2be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 3and a maximum of 60 years.4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 5Class X felony, except that:6        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 7    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 8    imprisonment imposed by the court;9        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 10    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be 11    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;12        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 13    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 14    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 15    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 16    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 17    imprisonment imposed by the court.18    (i) Definitions. In this Section:19    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 20the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 21Violence Shelters Act.22    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 23Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.24    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 25structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 26or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence   SB0273- 17 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 2Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 3of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 4who is going to or from such a building or other structure.5    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of 6the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 7include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 8Code. 9    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1024-1 of this Code.11    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1216-0.1 of this Code. 13    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 14breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 15applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 16by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 17(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 18    (720 ILCS 5/16-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 16-1)19    Sec. 16-1. Theft. 20    (a) A person commits theft when he or she knowingly:21        (1) Obtains or exerts unauthorized control over 22    property of the owner; or23        (2) Obtains by deception control over property of the 24    owner; or25        (3) Obtains by threat control over property of the   SB0273- 18 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    owner; or2        (4) Obtains control over stolen property knowing the 3    property to have been stolen or under such circumstances 4    as would reasonably induce him or her to believe that the 5    property was stolen; or6        (5) Obtains or exerts control over property in the 7    custody of any law enforcement agency which any law 8    enforcement officer or any individual acting in behalf of 9    a law enforcement agency explicitly represents to the 10    person as being stolen or represents to the person such 11    circumstances as would reasonably induce the person to 12    believe that the property was stolen, and13            (A) Intends to deprive the owner permanently of 14        the use or benefit of the property; or15            (B) Knowingly uses, conceals or abandons the 16        property in such manner as to deprive the owner 17        permanently of such use or benefit; or18            (C) Uses, conceals, or abandons the property 19        knowing such use, concealment or abandonment probably 20        will deprive the owner permanently of such use or 21        benefit.22    (b) Sentence.23        (1) Theft of property not from the person and not 24    exceeding $500 in value is a Class A misdemeanor.25        (1.1) Theft of property not from the person and not 26    exceeding $500 in value is a Class 4 felony if the theft   SB0273- 19 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    was committed in a school, or place of worship, nursing 2    home, an assisted living facility, or a supportive living 3    facility or if the theft was of governmental property.4        (2) A person who has been convicted of theft of 5    property not from the person and not exceeding $500 in 6    value who has been previously convicted of any type of 7    theft, robbery, armed robbery, burglary, residential 8    burglary, possession of burglary tools, home invasion, 9    forgery, a violation of Section 4-103, 4-103.1, 4-103.2, 10    or 4-103.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code relating to the 11    possession of a stolen or converted motor vehicle, or a 12    violation of Section 17-36 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 13    the Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 8 of the Illinois 14    Credit Card and Debit Card Act is guilty of a Class 4 15    felony.16        (3) (Blank).17        (4) Theft of property from the person not exceeding 18    $500 in value, or theft of property exceeding $500 and not 19    exceeding $10,000 in value, is a Class 3 felony.20        (4.1) Theft of property from the person not exceeding 21    $500 in value, or theft of property exceeding $500 and not 22    exceeding $10,000 in value, is a Class 2 felony if the 23    theft was committed in a school, or place of worship, 24    nursing home, an assisted living facility, or a supportive 25    living facility or if the theft was of governmental 26    property.  SB0273- 20 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1        (5) Theft of property exceeding $10,000 and not 2    exceeding $100,000 in value is a Class 2 felony.3        (5.1) Theft of property exceeding $10,000 and not 4    exceeding $100,000 in value is a Class 1 felony if the 5    theft was committed in a school, or place of worship, 6    nursing home, an assisted living facility, or a supportive 7    living facility or if the theft was of governmental 8    property.9        (6) Theft of property exceeding $100,000 and not 10    exceeding $500,000 in value is a Class 1 felony.11        (6.1) Theft of property exceeding $100,000 in value is 12    a Class X felony if the theft was committed in a school, or 13    place of worship, nursing home, an assisted living 14    facility, or a supportive living facility or if the theft 15    was of governmental property.16        (6.2) Theft of property exceeding $500,000 and not 17    exceeding $1,000,000 in value is a Class 1 18    non-probationable felony.19        (6.3) Theft of property exceeding $1,000,000 in value 20    is a Class X felony.21        (7) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph (2) 22    of subsection (a) of this Section from a victim aged at 23    least 60 years but not exceeding 69 years or a person with 24    a disability, in which the offender obtained money or 25    property with the following values:26            (A) not exceeding $300 is a Class 4 felony;  SB0273- 21 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1            (B) exceeding $300 but not exceeding $5,000 is a 2        Class 3 felony;3            (C) exceeding $5,000 but not exceeding $50,000 is 4        a Class 2 felony;5            (D) exceeding $50,000 but not exceeding $100,000 6        is a Class 1 felony; and7            (E) exceeding $100,000 is a Class X felony valued 8        at $5,000 or more from a victim 60 years of age or 9        older or a person with a disability is a Class 2 10        felony.11        (7.1) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph 12    (2) of subsection (a) of this Section, from a victim aged 13    at least 70 years but not exceeding 79 years in which the 14    offender obtained money or property with the following 15    values:16            (A) not exceeding $300 is a Class 4 felony; 17            (B) exceeding $300 but not exceeding $5,000 is a 18        Class 3 felony;19            (C) exceeding $5,000 but not exceeding $15,000 is 20        a Class 2 felony;21            (D) exceeding $15,000 but not exceeding $100,000 22        is a Class 1 felony; and23            (E) exceeding $100,000 is a Class X felony.24        (7.2) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph 25    (2) of subsection (a) of this Section, from a victim aged 26    at least 80 years in which the offender obtained money or   SB0273- 22 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    property with the following values:2            (A) not exceeding $300 is a Class 4 felony; 3            (B) exceeding $300 but not exceeding $5,000 is a 4        Class 3 felony;5            (C) exceeding $5,000 but not exceeding $100,000 is 6        a Class 1 felony; and7            (D) exceeding $100,000 is a Class X felony. 8        (8) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph (2) 9    of subsection (a) of this Section, in which the offender 10    falsely poses as a landlord or agent or employee of the 11    landlord and obtains a rent payment or a security deposit 12    from a tenant is a Class 3 felony if the rent payment or 13    security deposit obtained does not exceed $500.14        (9) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph (2) 15    of subsection (a) of this Section, in which the offender 16    falsely poses as a landlord or agent or employee of the 17    landlord and obtains a rent payment or a security deposit 18    from a tenant is a Class 2 felony if the rent payment or 19    security deposit obtained exceeds $500 and does not exceed 20    $10,000.21        (10) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph (2) 22    of subsection (a) of this Section, in which the offender 23    falsely poses as a landlord or agent or employee of the 24    landlord and obtains a rent payment or a security deposit 25    from a tenant is a Class 1 felony if the rent payment or 26    security deposit obtained exceeds $10,000 and does not   SB0273- 23 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    exceed $100,000.2        (11) Theft by deception, as described by paragraph (2) 3    of subsection (a) of this Section, in which the offender 4    falsely poses as a landlord or agent or employee of the 5    landlord and obtains a rent payment or a security deposit 6    from a tenant is a Class X felony if the rent payment or 7    security deposit obtained exceeds $100,000. 8    (c) When a charge of theft of property exceeding a 9specified value is brought, the value of the property involved 10is an element of the offense to be resolved by the trier of 11fact as either exceeding or not exceeding the specified value.12    (d) Theft by lessee; permissive inference. The trier of 13fact may infer evidence that a person intends to deprive the 14owner permanently of the use or benefit of the property (1) if 15a lessee of the personal property of another fails to return it 16to the owner within 10 days after written demand from the owner 17for its return or (2) if a lessee of the personal property of 18another fails to return it to the owner within 24 hours after 19written demand from the owner for its return and the lessee had 20presented identification to the owner that contained a 21materially fictitious name, address, or telephone number. A 22notice in writing, given after the expiration of the leasing 23agreement, addressed and mailed, by registered mail, to the 24lessee at the address given by him and shown on the leasing 25agreement shall constitute proper demand. 26    (e) Permissive inference; evidence of intent that a person   SB0273- 24 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1obtains by deception control over property. The trier of fact 2may infer that a person "knowingly obtains by deception 3control over property of the owner" when he or she fails to 4return, within 45 days after written demand from the owner, 5the downpayment and any additional payments accepted under a 6promise, oral or in writing, to perform services for the owner 7for consideration of $3,000 or more, and the promisor 8knowingly without good cause failed to substantially perform 9pursuant to the agreement after taking a down payment of 10% or 10more of the agreed upon consideration. This provision shall 11not apply where the owner initiated the suspension of 12performance under the agreement, or where the promisor 13responds to the notice within the 45-day notice period. A 14notice in writing, addressed and mailed, by registered mail, 15to the promisor at the last known address of the promisor, 16shall constitute proper demand.17    (f) Offender's interest in the property.18        (1) It is no defense to a charge of theft of property 19    that the offender has an interest therein, when the owner 20    also has an interest to which the offender is not 21    entitled.22        (2) Where the property involved is that of the 23    offender's spouse, no prosecution for theft may be 24    maintained unless the parties were not living together as 25    man and wife and were living in separate abodes at the time 26    of the alleged theft.   SB0273- 25 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1(Source: P.A. 101-394, eff. 1-1-20.) 2    (720 ILCS 5/17-56)  (was 720 ILCS 5/16-1.3)3    Sec. 17-56. Financial exploitation of an elderly person or 4a person with a disability.5    (a) A person commits financial exploitation of an elderly 6person or a person with a disability when he or she stands in a 7position of trust or confidence with the elderly person or a 8person with a disability and he or she knowingly:9        (1) by deception or intimidation obtains control over 10    the property of an elderly person or a person with a 11    disability; or12        (2) illegally uses the assets or resources of an 13    elderly person or a person with a disability.14    (b) Sentence. Financial exploitation of an elderly person 15or a person with a disability is: 16        (1) A a Class 4 felony if the value of the property is 17    $300 or less, 18        (2) A a Class 3 felony if the value of the property is 19    more than $300 but less than $5,000. , 20        (3) A a Class 2 felony if the value of the property is 21    $5,000 or more but less than $50,000. , and 22        (4) A a Class 1 felony: 23            (A) if the value of the property is $50,000 or more 24        but less than $100,000; or 25            (B) if the elderly person is 70 years of age or   SB0273- 26 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1        older and the value of the property is $15,000 or more 2        but less than $100,000; or 3            (C) if the elderly person is 80 years of age or 4        older and the value of the property is $5,000 or more 5        but less than $100,000.6        (5) A Class X felony if the value of the property is 7    $100,000 or more. 8    (c) For purposes of this Section:9        (1) "Elderly person" means a person 60 years of age or 10    older.11        (2) "Person with a disability" means a person who 12    suffers from a physical or mental impairment resulting 13    from disease, injury, functional disorder or congenital 14    condition that impairs the individual's mental or physical 15    ability to independently manage his or her property or 16    financial resources, or both.17        (3) "Intimidation" means the communication to an 18    elderly person or a person with a disability that he or she 19    shall be deprived of food and nutrition, shelter, 20    prescribed medication or medical care and treatment or 21    conduct as provided in Section 12-6 of this Code.22        (4) "Deception" means, in addition to its meaning as 23    defined in Section 15-4 of this Code, a misrepresentation 24    or concealment of material fact relating to the terms of a 25    contract or agreement entered into with the elderly person 26    or person with a disability or to the existing or   SB0273- 27 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    pre-existing condition of any of the property involved in 2    such contract or agreement; or the use or employment of 3    any misrepresentation, false pretense or false promise in 4    order to induce, encourage or solicit the elderly person 5    or person with a disability to enter into a contract or 6    agreement.7    The illegal use of the assets or resources of an elderly 8person or a person with a disability includes, but is not 9limited to, the misappropriation of those assets or resources 10by undue influence, breach of a fiduciary relationship, fraud, 11deception, extortion, or use of the assets or resources 12contrary to law.13    A person stands in a position of trust and confidence with 14an elderly person or person with a disability when he (i) is a 15parent, spouse, adult child or other relative by blood or 16marriage of the elderly person or person with a disability, 17(ii) is a joint tenant or tenant in common with the elderly 18person or person with a disability, (iii) has a legal or 19fiduciary relationship with the elderly person or person with 20a disability, (iv) is a financial planning or investment 21professional, (v) is a paid or unpaid caregiver for the 22elderly person or person with a disability, or (vi) is a friend 23or acquaintance in a position of trust.24    (d) Limitations. Nothing in this Section shall be 25construed to limit the remedies available to the victim under 26the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.  SB0273- 28 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1    (e) Good faith efforts. Nothing in this Section shall be 2construed to impose criminal liability on a person who has 3made a good faith effort to assist the elderly person or person 4with a disability in the management of his or her property, but 5through no fault of his or her own has been unable to provide 6such assistance.7    (f) Not a defense. It shall not be a defense to financial 8exploitation of an elderly person or person with a disability 9that the accused reasonably believed that the victim was not 10an elderly person or person with a disability. Consent is not a 11defense to financial exploitation of an elderly person or a 12person with a disability if the accused knew or had reason to 13know that the elderly person or a person with a disability 14lacked capacity to consent. 15    (g) Civil Liability. A civil cause of action exists for 16financial exploitation of an elderly person or a person with a 17disability as described in subsection (a) of this Section. A 18person against whom a civil judgment has been entered for 19financial exploitation of an elderly person or person with a 20disability shall be liable to the victim or to the estate of 21the victim in damages of treble the amount of the value of the 22property obtained, plus reasonable attorney fees and court 23costs. In a civil action under this subsection, the burden of 24proof that the defendant committed financial exploitation of 25an elderly person or a person with a disability as described in 26subsection (a) of this Section shall be by a preponderance of   SB0273- 29 -LRB104 03857 RLC 13881 b1the evidence. This subsection shall be operative whether or 2not the defendant has been charged or convicted of the 3criminal offense as described in subsection (a) of this 4Section. This subsection (g) shall not limit or affect the 5right of any person to bring any cause of action or seek any 6remedy available under the common law, or other applicable 7law, arising out of the financial exploitation of an elderly 8person or a person with a disability. 9    (h) If a person is charged with financial exploitation of 10an elderly person or a person with a disability that involves 11the taking or loss of property valued at more than $5,000, a 12prosecuting attorney may file a petition with the circuit 13court of the county in which the defendant has been charged to 14freeze the assets of the defendant in an amount equal to but 15not greater than the alleged value of lost or stolen property 16in the defendant's pending criminal proceeding for purposes of 17restitution to the victim. The burden of proof required to 18freeze the defendant's assets shall be by a preponderance of 19the evidence. 20(Source: P.A. 102-244, eff. 1-1-22; 103-293, eff. 1-1-24.)